bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за електроника > Кабели > Системни и захранващи кабели: Захранващи кабели за променлив ток; Захранващи кабели за постоянен ток
hu: Elektronika > Elektronikai kiegészítők > Kábelek > Rendszer- és tápkábelek: Váltóáramú tápkábelek; Egyenáramú tápkábelek
de: Elektronik > Elektronisches Zubehör > Kabel > System- & Netzkabel: AC-Stromkabel; DC-Stromkabel
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Καλώδια > Συστήματα & καλώδια τροφοδοσίας: Καλώδια τροφοδοσίας AC; Καλώδια τροφοδοσίας DC
ja: 電子機器 > 電気製品関連用品・PC周辺機器 > ケーブル > システムケーブル・電源ケーブル: AC電源コード; DC電源ケーブル
ko: 전자기기 > 전자기기 부대용품 > 케이블 > 시스템/전원 케이블: AC 전원 코드; DC 전원 케이블
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii electronice > Cabluri > Cabluri de sistem și cabluri de alimentare: Cabluri de alimentare c.a.; Cabluri de alimentare c.c.
cs: Elektronika > Elektronika – příslušenství > Kabely > Systémové a napájecí kabely: Napájecí kabely AC; Napájecí kabely DC
es: Electrónica > Accesorios electrónicos > Cables > Cables de alimentación: Cables de corriente alterna; Cables de corriente continua
it: Elettronica > Accessori dispositivi elettronici > Cavi > Cavi sistemi e alimentazione: Cavi di alimentazione CA; Cavi di alimentazione CC
tr: Elektronik > Elektronik Alet Aksesuarları > Kablolar > Sistem ve Güç Kabloları: AC Güç Kabloları; DC Güç Kabloları
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電子配件 > 線材 > 系統/電源線材: 交流電源線; 直流電源線
nb: Elektronikk > Elektronikktilbehør > Kabler > System- og strømkabler: AC-strømkabler; DC-strømkabler
sk-SK: Elektronika > Elektronické príslušenstvo > Káble > Systémové a napájacie káble: AC napájacie šnúry; DC napájacie káble
sl-SI: Elektronika > Elektronski dodatki > Kabli > Sistemski in napajalni kabli: AC napajalni kabli; DC napajalni kabli
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для электроники > Кабели > Системные кабели и кабели питания: Шнуры питания переменного тока; Кабели питания постоянного тока
en: Electronics > Electronics Accessories > Cables > System & Power Cables: AC Power Cords; DC Power Cables
lt-LT: Elektronika > Elektronikos priedai > Kabeliai > Sistemos ir maitinimo kabeliai: Kintamosios srovės maitinimo laidai; Nuolatinės srovės maitinimo laidai
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria elektroniczne > Kable > Kable systemowe i zasilające: Przewody zasilające AC; Kable zasilające DC
sv: Elektronik > Elektroniktillbehör > Kablar > System- och strömkablar: Nätsladdar; Likströmskablar
nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor elektronica > Kabels > Systeem- en voedingskabels: AC stroomkabels; DC stroomkabels
fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires électroniques > Câbles pour appareils électroniques > Câbles système et d’alimentation: Cordons d’alimentation CA; Câbles d’alimentation CC
hr-HR: Elektronika > Pribor za elektroniku > Kabeli > Kabeli za sustav i napajanje: AC strujni kabeli; DC strujni kabeli
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para eletrônicos > Cabos > Cabos para eletricidade e sistemas: Cabos de alimentação AC; Cabos de alimentação DC
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子配件 > 线缆 > 系统与电源电缆: 交流电源线; 直流电源线
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện tử > Dây cáp > Cáp hệ thống & cáp nguồn: Dây cáp nguồn AC; Cáp nguồn DC
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios eletrónicos > Cabos > Cabos de sistema e alimentação: Cabos de alimentação AC; Cabos de alimentação DC
da: Elektronik > Elektronik – tilbehør > Kabler > System- og strømkabler: Vekselstrømskabler; Jævnstrømskabler
fi: Elektroniikka > Sähkötarvikkeet > Kaapelit > Järjestelmä- ja virtakaapelit: Vaihtovirtajohdot; Tasavirtakaapelit
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > สายสัญญาณ > เคเบิลระบบและไฟฟ้า: สายไฟ AC; สายเคเบิลไฟ DC